pl: Skład oleju silnikowego: O wydłużonym działaniu; Do flot / do dużych obciążeń; Dla dużych przebiegów; Standardowe; Inne
th: สูตรน้ำมันเครื่อง: ประสิทธิภาพสูง (ยืดอายุการเปลี่ยนถ่าย); รถฟลีท/งานหนัก; เลขไมล์สูง; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
da: Motorolieformel: Forbedret ydeevne (forlænget skifteinterval); Flåde / heavy-duty; Højt kilometertal; Standard; Andet
ro-RO: Formularea uleiului de motor: Performanță extinsă (schimb la interval prelungit); Flotă auto / regim greu (heavy-duty); Rulaj mare; Standard; Altele
ja: エンジンオイルの配合: エクステンデッドパフォーマンス (長寿命); フリート/ヘビーデューティー; 多走行車向け; スタンダード; その他
it: Formulazione dell'olio motore: Prestazioni estese (intervallo di cambio prolungato); Flotta / veicoli pesanti; Elevato chilometraggio; Standard; Altro
sl-SI: Formulacija motornega olja: Povečana zmogljivost (podaljšan interval menjave); Vozni parki / zahtevni pogoji; Veliko število prevoženih kilometrov; Standardna; Drugo
sk-SK: Zloženie motorového oleja: Zvýšený výkon (predĺžený interval výmeny); Pre vozové parky / na vysoké zaťaženie; Na vysoký počet najazdených kilometrov; Štandardný; Iné
fi: Moottoriöljyn koostumus: Parannettu suorituskyky (pidennetty vaihtoväli); Raskas kalusto / raskas käyttö; Paljon ajetut; Vakio; Muu
cs: Složení motorového oleje: Prodloužený výkon (prodloužený interval výměny); Pro vozové parky / vysoké zatížení; Pro vysoký nájezd; Standardní; Jiné
zh-TW: 機油配方: 延長效能 (延長換油週期); 車隊/重型; 高里程; 標準; 其他
ru: Тип состава моторного масла: Улучшенные характеристики (увеличенный интервал замены); Для коммерческого транспорта / тяжелых условий эксплуатации; Для большого пробега; Стандартное; Другое
tr: Motor yağı formülasyonu: Uzun ömürlü performans (uzun değişim aralığı); Filo / ağır vasıta; Yüksek kilometre; Standart; Diğer
nl: Motorolie formulering: Verlengde prestaties (langere verversingsinterval); Wagenpark / heavy-duty; Hoge kilometerstand; Standaard; Overig
zh-CN: 发动机油配方: 长效性能（延长换油周期）; 车队/重型; 高里程; 标准; 其他
ko: 엔진 오일 배합: 성능 확장형(교환 주기 연장); 상용차/대형; 하이 마일리지; 표준; 기타
nb: Formulering av motorolje: Utvidet ytelse (forlenget oljeskiftintervall); Flåte / tungtransport; Høy kilometerstand; Standard; Annet
fr: Formulation de l’huile moteur: Performance prolongée (vidange prolongée); Parc automobile/usage intensif; Kilométrage élevé; Standard; Autre
en: Engine oil formulation: Extended performance (extended drain); Fleet / heavy-duty; High-mileage; Standard; Other
el: Σύνθεση λαδιού κινητήρα: Εκτεταμένης απόδοσης (εκτεταμένο διάστημα αλλαγής); Στόλου / βαρέως τύπου; Υψηλής χιλιομετρικής απόδοσης; Τυπική; Άλλο
pt-PT: formulação de óleo de motor: Desempenho prolongado (mudança prolongada); Frotas / trabalho pesado; Alta quilometragem; Padrão; Outro
hr-HR: Formulacija motornog ulja: Poboljšana izvedba (produljeni interval zamjene); Vozni park / teški uvjeti rada; Velika kilometraža; Standardno; Ostalo
lt-LT: Variklio alyvos formulė: Pailginto keitimo intervalo; Komerciniam transportui / didelėms apkrovoms; Didelės ridos automobiliams; Standartinė; Kita
sv: Motoroljans formulering: Utökad prestanda (längre bytesintervall); Vagnpark/tung drift; Hög körsträcka; Standard; Annat
es: Formulación del aceite de motor: Rendimiento extendido (drenaje extendido); Flota/trabajo pesado; Alto kilometraje; Estándar; Otra
hu: Motorolaj-összetétel: Növelt teljesítményű (meghosszabbított csereperiódusú); Flotta / nagy teherbírású; Nagy futásteljesítményű; Szabványos; Egyéb
pt-BR: Formulação de óleo do motor: Alto desempenho (troca estendida); Frotas/serviço pesado; Alta quilometragem; Padrão; Outro
de: Motorenölformulierung: Verlängerte Leistung (verlängerte Wechselintervalle); Flotte / Heavy-Duty; Hohe Laufleistung; Standard; Sonstige
vi: Công thức dầu động cơ: Hiệu suất kéo dài (chu kỳ thay nhớt dài); Đội xe / tải trọng nặng; Số dặm cao; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
bg-BG: Формула на моторното масло: Удължена ефективност (удължен интервал за смяна); Автопаркове/тежкотоварни; Голям пробег; Стандартно; Друго